Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Chapter 20. Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act.

Cross references. —

For provision allowing automobile insurers to exclude coverage that may otherwise be required by this chapter “for any loss or injury that occurs while a driver is logged onto the digital network of a transportation network company or while a driver provides a prearranged ride,” see AS

21.96.018

.

Sec. 28.20.010.
Declaration of purpose.

The legislature is concerned over the rising toll of motor vehicle accidents and the suffering and loss inflicted by them.
The legislature determines that it is a matter of grave concern that motorists be financially responsible for their negligent acts so that innocent victims of motor vehicle accidents may be recompensed for the injury and financial loss inflicted upon them.
The legislature finds and declares that the public interest can best be served by the requirements that the operator of a motor vehicle involved in an accident respond for damages and show proof of financial ability to respond for damages in future accidents as a prerequisite to the person’s exercise of the privilege of operating a motor vehicle in the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.020.
Administration.

The department shall administer and enforce this chapter and may adopt regulations necessary for its administration.

The department shall receive and consider any pertinent information upon request of persons aggrieved by its orders or acts under this chapter.

The department shall prescribe and provide suitable forms requisite or considered necessary to carry out this chapter.

History.

(§ 4 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For safety responsibility, see 2 AAC 90, art. 3.

Sec. 28.20.030.
Court review. [Repealed, § 4 ch 140 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 28.20.040.
Department to furnish operating record. [Repealed, § 20 ch 241 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 28.20.050.
Application of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter requiring deposit of security and suspension for failure to deposit security apply to the driver and owner of a vehicle subject to registration under the laws of this state that is involved in any manner in an accident in this state resulting in bodily injury to or death of a person or damage to the property of any one person exceeding $501.

Not less than 20 days after receipt of a report of such accident, the department shall determine the amount of security that it considers sufficient to satisfy any judgments for damages resulting from the accident that may be recovered against each driver or owner. The determination may not be made with respect to a driver or owner who is exempt from the requirements as to security and suspension.

The department shall determine the amount of security deposit required upon the basis of the reports or other information submitted. If a person involved in an accident as described in this chapter fails to make a report or submit information indicating the extent of the person’s injuries or the damage to the person’s property within 30 days after the accident, and the department does not have sufficient information on which to base an evaluation of injuries or damage, then the department after reasonable notice to the person, if it is possible to give notice, otherwise without notice, may not require a deposit of security for the benefit or protection of the person.

Within 30 days after receipt of report of an accident and upon determining the amount of security to be required of any person involved in the accident or to be required of the owner of any vehicle involved in the accident, the department shall give to every person written notice of the amount of security required to be deposited by the person and stating that an order of suspension will be made upon the expiration of 10 days after the notice is sent unless within that time security is deposited as required. A license may not be suspended unless the licensee is afforded a hearing by the department at which it is determined that there is a reasonable possibility of a judgment being rendered holding the licensee liable.

A peace officer investigating an accident that results in bodily injury to or the death of a person or damage to the property of a person exceeding $501 shall inform persons involved in the accident in writing of the requirements of this chapter as they apply to suspension of an operator’s license or driving privileges.

History.

(§ 7 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 127 SLA 1972; am § 11 ch 144 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 78 SLA 1982; am §§ 12, 13 ch 6 FSSLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For safety responsibility, see 2 AAC 90, art. 3.

Sec. 28.20.060.
Exceptions to requirement of security.

The requirements as to security and suspension in this chapter do not apply to

the driver or owner if the owner had in effect at the time of the accident an automobile liability policy or bond with respect to the vehicle involved in the accident, except that a driver is not exempt if at the time of the accident the vehicle was operated without the owner’s express or implied permission;

the driver who is not the owner if there was in effect at the time of the accident an automobile liability policy or bond with respect to the person’s driving of vehicles not owned by the driver;

a driver or owner whose liability for damages resulting from the accident is, in the judgment of the department, covered by another form of liability insurance policy or bond;

a person qualifying as a self-insurer under AS

28.20.400

or to a person operating a vehicle for a self-insurer;

the driver or owner of a vehicle involved in an accident in which no injury or damage was caused to the person or property of anyone other than the driver or owner;

the driver or owner of a vehicle that at the time of the accident was parked, unless the vehicle was parked at a place where parking was at the time of the accident prohibited by a law or ordinance;

the owner of a vehicle if at the time of the accident the vehicle was operated without the owner’s express or implied permission or was parked by a person who had been operating the vehicle without the owner’s permission;

the owner of a vehicle or the driver of a vehicle operating it with permission if at the time of the accident the vehicle was owned or leased to the United States, this state or a political subdivision of this state or a municipality of the state; or

the driver or the owner of a vehicle if at the time of the accident the vehicle was operated by or under the direction of a police officer who, in the performance of official duties, assumed custody of the vehicle.

History.

(§ 8 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

A portion of paragraph (7) of this section was rewritten in 1984 to correct an error made in the 1962 codification and conform the language of the paragraph to the 1959 enactment.

Opinions of attorney general. —

For a motor vehicle operator to be exempt from the security and suspension provisions of the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act, an automobile owned by a resident and registered in Alaska must be insured by a company authorized to do business in Alaska. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

To be in effect at the time of the accident, the liability policy of a nonresident driver-owner of a vehicle registered in Alaska must have been issued prior to the accident by a company authorized to do business in Alaska.
Otherwise, the requirements of the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act as to security and suspension shall apply. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

If the vehicle is registered in Alaska, the only policies that are effective with respect to it are those issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in Alaska.
Any other policy is not effective regardless of execution of a power of attorney. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

In order to be excepted from the requirements as to security and suspension in the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act, an unauthorized insurer’s power of attorney must be on file with the insurance commissioner prior to the accident. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

Sec. 28.20.070.
Requirements as to policy or bond.

A policy or bond is not effective under AS

28.20.060

unless it is issued by an insurance company or surety company authorized to do business in this state, except as provided in (b) of this section, and if the accident resulted in bodily injury or death, unless the policy or bond is subject to a limit, exclusive of interest and costs, of not less than $50,000 because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident and, subject to the same limit for one person, to a limit of not less than $100,000 because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, and if the accident has resulted in injury to, or destruction of, property to a limit of not less than $25,000 because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident.

A policy or bond is not effective under AS

28.20.060

with respect to a vehicle not registered in this state or a vehicle that was registered in another jurisdiction at the effective date of the policy or bond or the most recent renewal of it, unless the insurance or surety company issuing the policy or bond is authorized to do business in this state, or if the company is not authorized to do business in this state, unless it executes a power of attorney authorizing the director of the division of insurance to accept service on its behalf of notice or process in an action upon the policy or bond arising out of the accident.

The department may rely upon the information in an accident report as to the existence of insurance or a bond unless the department has reason to believe that the information is erroneous.

History.

(§ 9 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 146 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 202 SLA 1975; am § 12 ch 144 SLA 1977; am § 8 ch 70 SLA 1984)

Opinions of attorney general. —

If the vehicle is not registered in Alaska, the fact that the policy is renewed while the vehicle is in Alaska does not mean that a second power of attorney must be executed by the unauthorized insurance company unless the first power of attorney has expired or been revoked. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

Sec. 28.20.080.
Form and amount of security.

The security required by this chapter must be in the form and amount the department requires, but in no case in excess of the limits specified in AS

28.20.070

for the acceptable limits of a policy or bond.

Every depositor of security shall designate in writing the person in whose name the deposit is made and may at any time change the designation, but a single deposit of security applies only on behalf of a person required to furnish security because of the same accident.

History.

(§ 10 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For safety responsibility, see 2 AAC 90, art. 3.

Sec. 28.20.090.
Suspension for failure to deposit security.

If a person required to deposit security under this chapter fails to deposit security within 10 days after the department sends notice, the department shall suspend

the license of each driver involved in the accident;

the privilege of operating a vehicle subject to registration if the driver is a nonresident;

the privilege of the owner to operate or permit the operation within this state of a vehicle subject to registration if the owner is a nonresident.

Suspensions shall be made in respect to persons required by the department to deposit security who fail to deposit such security, except as otherwise provided under succeeding sections of this chapter.

History.

(§ 11 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.100.
Release from liability.

A person is relieved from the requirement for deposit of security for the benefit or protection of another person injured or damaged in the accident if the person is released from liability by the other person.

A covenant not to sue relieves the parties to it as to each other from the security requirements of this chapter.

If the department evaluates the injuries or damage to a minor in an amount not more than $501, the department may accept, for the purposes of this chapter only, evidence of a release from liability executed by a parent or legal guardian on behalf of the minor without court approval.

History.

(§ 12 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 13 ch 144 SLA 1977; am § 14 ch 6 FSSLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For safety responsibility, see 2 AAC 90, art. 3.

Sec. 28.20.110.
Adjudication of nonliability.

A person is relieved from the requirement for deposit of security for a claim for injury or damage arising out of the accident if the person is finally adjudicated not to be liable for the claim.

History.

(§ 13 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.120.
Agreements for payment of damages.

Two or more persons involved in or affected by an accident as described in AS

28.20.050

may at any time enter into a written agreement for the payment of an agreed amount with respect to their claims because of bodily injury, death, or property damage arising from the accident. The agreement may provide for payment in installments. The parties may file a signed copy of the agreement with the department.

If proof of financial responsibility is provided and to the extent provided by the written agreement filed with it, the department may not require the deposit of security and shall terminate a previous order of suspension, or if security was deposited, the department shall immediately return the security to the depositor or the personal representative of the depositor.

If there is a default in a payment under the agreement, upon notice of default the department shall take action suspending the license of the person in default as is appropriate in case of failure of the person to deposit security when required under this chapter.

The suspension remains in effect and the license may not be restored until

security is deposited as required under this chapter in the amount the department determines; or

when, following default and suspension, the person in default pays the balance of the agreed amount; or

one year elapses following the effective date of the suspension and evidence satisfactory to the department is filed with it that during the period no action at law upon the agreement is pending.

History.

(§ 14 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 78 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For safety responsibility, see 2 AAC 90, art. 3.

Sec. 28.20.130.
Payment upon judgment.

The payment of a judgment arising out of an accident, or the payment upon judgment of an amount equal to the maximum amount that could be required for deposit under this chapter, for the purposes of this chapter, releases the judgment debtor from the liability evidenced by the judgment.

History.

(§ 15 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 12 ch 2 SLA 1964)

Sec. 28.20.140.
Termination of security requirement.

If satisfied as to the existence of a fact that under AS

28.20.100

—

28.20.130

entitles a person to be relieved from the security requirements, the department may not require the deposit of security and shall terminate a previous order of suspension in respect to the person, and shall immediately return the deposit to the person or the personal representative of the person.

History.

(§ 16 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.150.
Duration of suspension.

Unless a suspension is terminated under other provisions of this chapter, an order of suspension by the department remains in effect until terminated and a license may not be renewed or issued to a person whose license is suspended until proof of financial responsibility for the future is provided and

the person deposits or there is deposited on behalf of the person the security required under this chapter; or

three years elapse following the date of suspension.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 78 SLA 1982.]

History.

(§ 17 ch 163 SLA 1959; am §§ 5, 9 ch 78 SLA 1982)

Sec. 28.20.160.
Application to nonresidents, unlicensed drivers, unregistered vehicles, and accidents in other states.

If a driver or owner of a vehicle subject to registration under the laws of this state involved in an accident in this state does not have a license or registration in this state, then the driver may not be licensed, nor may the owner register a vehicle in this state until the person complies with the requirements of this chapter to the extent necessary if, at the time of the accident, the person had held a license or been the owner of a vehicle registered in this state.

When a nonresident’s operating privilege is suspended under AS

28.20.090

the department shall send a certified copy of the record of the action to the official in charge of the issuance of licenses and registration certificates in the state in which the nonresident resides, if the law of the other state provides for action similar to that provided for in (c) of this section.

Upon receiving certification that the operating privilege of a resident of this state has been suspended or revoked in another state under a law providing for its suspension or revocation for failure to deposit security for the payment of judgments arising out of an accident under circumstances that would require the department to suspend a nonresident’s operating privilege if the accident had occurred in this state, the department shall suspend the license of the resident. The suspension continues until the resident furnishes evidence of compliance with the law of the other state relating to the deposit of security.

History.

(§ 18 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.170.
Authority of department to decrease amount of security.

The department may reduce the amount of security ordered within six months after the date of the accident if in its judgment the amount is excessive. If the security originally ordered is on deposit, the excess deposit over the reduced amount ordered shall be returned immediately to the depositor or the personal representative of the depositor.

History.

(§ 19 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.180.
Correction of action of department.

If the department takes action or fails to take action under this chapter due to erroneous information or no information, upon receiving correct information within one year after the date of an accident the department shall take appropriate action to carry out the purposes and effect of this chapter. However, this section does not require the department to re-evaluate the amount of a deposit required.

History.

(§ 20 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.190.
Custody of security.

The department shall place security deposited with it in the custody of the Department of Revenue.

History.

(§ 21 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.200.
Disposition of security.

The security deposited is available only for

the payment of a settlement agreement covering a claim arising out of the accident upon instruction of the person who made the deposit, or

the payment of a judgment given against the person required to make the deposit for damages arising out of the accident in an action at law begun not later than one year after the deposit of security, or within one year after the date of deposit of security following failure to make payments under an agreement to pay.

Every distribution of funds from a security deposit is subject to the limits of the department’s evaluation on behalf of a claimant.

History.

(§ 22 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.210.
Return of deposit.

Upon the expiration of two years from the date of deposit of security, the security remaining on deposit shall be returned to the person who made the deposit or the person’s personal representative if an affidavit or other evidence satisfactory to the department is filed with it showing that

no action for damages arising out of the accident for which deposit was made is pending against the person on whose behalf the deposit was made, and

there does not exist any unpaid judgment against the person in an action.

This section does not limit the return of a deposit of security under any other provision of this chapter authorizing return.

History.

(§ 23 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 6 ch 78 SLA 1982)

Sec. 28.20.220.
Matters not to be evidence in civil suits.

The report required after an accident, the action taken by the department under this chapter, the findings, if any, of the department upon which its action is based, and the security filed may not be referred to, and may not be evidence of the negligence or due care of either party, at the trial of an action to recover damages.

History.

(§ 24 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.230.
Proof of financial responsibility for the future.

The provisions of this chapter requiring the deposit of proof of financial responsibility for the future apply to persons who are convicted of or forfeit bail for certain offenses under motor vehicle laws or who, by ownership or operation of a vehicle of a type subject to registration under AS 28.10, are involved in an accident in this state that results in bodily injury to or death of a person or damage to the property of any one person exceeding $501.

[Repealed, § 30 ch 108 SLA 1989.]

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, a person convicted of driving under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance in violation of AS

28.35.030

, or convicted of refusal to submit to a chemical test of breath under AS

28.35.032

, shall maintain proof of financial responsibility for the future for (1) five years if the person has not been previously convicted; (2) 10 years if the person has been previously convicted once; (3) 20 years if the person has been previously convicted twice; (4) for as long as the person is licensed to drive under AS 28.15 if the person has been previously convicted three or more times. In this subsection, “previously convicted” has the meaning given in AS

28.35.030

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 59 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 202 SLA 1975; am § 14 ch 144 SLA 1977; am § 9 ch 70 SLA 1984; am § 30 ch 108 SLA 1989; am § 15 ch 6 FSSLA 1996; am § 19 ch 60 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

For provisions requiring proof of financial responsibility for the future as a condition for reinstating a revoked or suspended driver’s license, see AS

28.15.255

. For mandatory motor vehicle insurance, see AS 28.22.

Administrative Code. —

For safety responsibility, see 2 AAC 90, art. 3.

Sec. 28.20.240.
Proof required when driving privilege is restricted.

Whenever under a law of this state the license of a person is suspended, revoked, limited under AS

28.15.201

, or canceled for any reason, the department may not issue to that person a new or renewal of license until permitted to do so under the motor vehicle laws of this state.
A period of suspension, revocation, or cancellation continues until proof of financial responsibility for the future is provided. Upon expiration of a period of limitation, the license remains revoked until proof of financial responsibility for the future is provided.

History.

(§ 26 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 7 ch 78 SLA 1982; am § 12 ch 77 SLA 1983)

Administrative Code. —

For safety responsibility, see 2 AAC 90, art. 3.

Sec. 28.20.250.
Action in respect to unlicensed person.

If a person does not have a license, but by final order or judgment is convicted of, or forfeits bail or collateral deposited to secure an appearance for trial for an offense requiring the suspension or revocation of license, or for driving a motor vehicle upon the highways without being licensed to do so, or for driving an unregistered vehicle upon the highways, a license may not be issued to the person unless the person gives and thereafter maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future.

Whenever the department suspends or revokes a nonresident’s operating privilege for conviction or forfeiture of bail, the privilege remains suspended or revoked unless the person has previously given or immediately gives proof of financial responsibility for the future.

History.

(§ 27 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.260.
When proof required after accidents.

Upon receipt by the department of the report of an accident resulting in bodily injury to or death of a person, or damage to the property of any one person exceeding $501, the department shall suspend the license of the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the accident unless the driver or owner

has previously furnished or immediately furnishes security required by this chapter, or is excepted from furnishing security under AS

28.20.060

; and

maintains proof of financial responsibility for three years following the accident.

This section does not apply to an owner or operator with respect to an accident in which a judgment in the owner’s or operator’s favor is given on a cause of action arising out of the accident that establishes the owner’s or operator’s freedom from fault.

History.

(§ 28 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 15 ch 144 SLA 1977; am § 16 ch 6 FSSLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For safety responsibility, see 2 AAC 90, art. 3.

Sec. 28.20.270.
Suspension for nonpayment of judgments.

Upon receipt of a certified copy of a judgment and a certificate of facts relative to the judgment, the department shall immediately suspend the license or nonresident’s operating privilege of a person against whom the judgment is given except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 29 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.280.
When courts to report nonpayment of judgments.

If a person fails within 30 days to satisfy a judgment arising out of a motor vehicle accident, the clerk of the court, or the judge if there is no clerk, in which the judgment is given, shall forward to the department a certified copy of the judgment and a certificate of facts relative to the judgment.

History.

(§ 30 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.290.
Further action with respect to nonresidents.

If the defendant named in a certified copy of a judgment reported to the department is a nonresident, the department shall send a certified copy of the judgment to the official in charge of the issuance of licenses and registrations of the state of which the defendant is a resident.

History.

(§ 31 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.300.
Exception for government vehicles.

AS

28.20.260

and

28.20.270

do not apply to an accident caused by the ownership or operation, with permission, of a vehicle owned or leased to the United States, this state, or a political subdivision or municipality of this state.

History.

(§ 32 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.310.
Exception when consent granted by judgment creditor.

If the judgment creditor consents in writing in a form prescribed by the department to the issuance of a license or nonresident’s operating privilege to the judgment debtor, the department may allow it for six months from the date of such consent and thereafter until the consent is revoked in writing, if the judgment debtor furnishes proof of financial responsibility notwithstanding default in the payment of judgment, or of an installment of the judgment prescribed in AS

28.20.270

.

History.

(§ 33 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.320.
Exceptions when insurer liable.

A license or nonresident’s operating privilege may not be suspended under this chapter if the department finds that an insurer is obligated to pay the judgment upon which suspension is based at least to the extent and for the amounts required in this chapter, but has not paid the judgment for any reason.
A finding by the department that an insurer is obligated to pay a judgment is not binding upon the insurer and has no legal effect except for the purpose of administering this section.
If in a judicial proceeding it is determined by a final judgment, decree, or order that an insurer is not obligated to pay a judgment, the department, notwithstanding any contrary finding made by it, shall immediately suspend the license or nonresident’s operating privilege of a person against whom the judgment is given, as provided in AS

28.20.270

.

History.

(§ 34 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.325.
Exemption for certain employee-drivers; applicability to employer.

If the driver at the time of an accident was driving, in the course and scope of employment, a vehicle owned, operated, or leased by the driver’s employer, the security deposit, proof of future responsibility, and suspension provisions of this chapter apply to the employer and to the vehicles owned by the employer or registered under the employer’s name and do not apply to the driver.

History.

(§ 1 ch 25 SLA 1966)

Sec. 28.20.330.
Suspension to continue until judgments paid and proof given.

If there is an unsatisfied judgment against a person requiring suspension under AS

28.20.270

, the person’s license or nonresident’s operating privilege shall remain suspended and shall not be renewed, nor shall a license or registration be issued in the name of the person, including a person not previously licensed, until the judgment is stayed or satisfied and until the person gives proof of financial responsibility subject to the exceptions in AS

28.20.310

,

28.20.320

, and

28.20.370

.

The proof required by (a) of this section shall be maintained during the period the person has a license or nonresident’s operating privilege.

History.

(§ 35 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For safety responsibility, see 2 AAC 90, art. 3.

Sec. 28.20.340.
Driving while license cancelled, suspended, or revoked.

Upon receiving a record of the conviction of a person for driving a vehicle while the person’s license was suspended, the department shall immediately suspend the registration of every vehicle registered in the person’s name until the person gives proof of financial responsibility for the future for each vehicle registered in the person’s name.

History.

(§ 36 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For safety responsibility, see 2 AAC 90, art. 3.

Sec. 28.20.350.
Discharge in bankruptcy. [Repealed, § 42 ch 53 SLA 1973.]

Sec. 28.20.360.
Payments sufficient to satisfy requirements.

In this chapter, a judgment is satisfied when

$50,000 is credited upon a judgment given in excess of that amount because of bodily injury to or death of one person as the result of any one accident;

subject to the limit of $50,000 because of bodily injury to or death of one person, the sum of $100,000 is credited upon a judgment given in excess of that amount because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons as the result of any one accident; or

$25,000 is credited upon a judgment given in excess of that amount because of injury to or destruction of property of others as a result of any one accident.

However, payments made in settlement of a claim because of bodily injury, death, or property damage arising from the accident shall be credited in reduction of the amounts provided for in this section.

History.

(§ 38 ch 163 SLA 1959; am §§ 60, 61 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 202 SLA 1975; am § 10 ch 70 SLA 1984)

Sec. 28.20.370.
Installment payment of judgments; default.

A judgment debtor upon due notice to the judgment creditor may apply to the court in which such judgment was rendered for the privilege of paying the judgment in installments and the court, without prejudice at any other legal remedy, may order and fix the amount and time of payment of the installments.

The department may not suspend a license or nonresident’s operating privilege, and shall restore a license or nonresident’s operating privilege suspended following nonpayment of a judgment, when the judgment debtor gives proof of financial responsibility and obtains an order permitting the payment of the judgment in installments.

If the judgment debtor fails to pay an installment specified by the court order, upon notice of default, the department shall immediately suspend the license or nonresident’s operating privilege of the judgment debtor until the judgment is satisfied as provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 39 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.380.
Registration and operator’s rights limited by extent of proof.

When a certificate is filed showing that a policy is issued covering a motor vehicle owned by the insured, but not insuring the person when operating a motor vehicle not owned by the person, the restriction may be removed upon the filing of a certificate showing an operator’s policy issued to the person.

If the department receives evidence of the violation of the restriction on the license, it may suspend the license until a certificate is filed showing an operator’s policy issued to the holder of the license.

History.

(§ 40 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.390.
Proof by persons who do not own a vehicle.

Proof of financial responsibility for a person who is not the owner of a vehicle may be given by filing

a certificate of insurance as provided in AS

28.20.410

or

28.20.420

;

a bond as provided in AS

28.20.470

; or

a certificate of self-insurance as provided in AS

28.20.400

, supplemented by an agreement by the self-insurer that, for accidents occurring while the certificate is in force, the self-insurer will pay the same amount that an insurer would be obligated to pay under an owner’s motor vehicle liability policy if it had issued a policy to the self-insurer.

History.

(§ 41 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 15 ch 70 SLA 1984)

Sec. 28.20.400.
Self-insurers.

A person in whose name more than 25 vehicles are registered in this state may qualify as a self-insurer by obtaining a certificate of self-insurance issued by the department as provided in (b) of this section. A person in whose name 25 or fewer vehicles are registered qualifies as a self-insurer and shall be issued a certificate of self-insurance if the person provides proof satisfactory to the department that the person has and will continue to have the ability to pay a judgment for property damage, bodily injury, or both, in the amount of at least $125,000.

The department may issue a certificate of self-insurance when it is satisfied that the person has and will continue to have ability to pay judgments obtained against the person. The certificate may be issued authorizing a person to act as a self-insurer for either property damage or bodily injury, or both, or within the limits the department prescribes.

Upon not less than 10 days’ notice and a hearing pursuant to the notice, the department may upon reasonable grounds cancel a certificate of self-insurance. Failure to pay a judgment within 30 days after judgment becomes final is a reasonable ground for the cancellation of a certificate of self-insurance.

History.

(§ 42 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 27 ch 108 SLA 1989; am § 37 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Sec. 28.20.410.
Certificate of insurance as proof.

Proof of financial responsibility for the future may be furnished by filing with the department the written certificate of an insurance carrier authorized to do business in this state certifying that there is in effect a motor vehicle liability policy for the benefit of the person required to furnish proof of financial responsibility.
The certificate must give the effective date of the motor vehicle liability policy, which must be the same as the effective date of the certificate, and must designate by description or appropriate reference all vehicles covered by it, unless the policy is issued to a person who is not the owner of a motor vehicle.

History.

(§ 43 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.420.
Certificate furnished by nonresident as proof.

A nonresident may give proof of financial responsibility by filing with the department a written certificate of an insurance carrier authorized to transact business in the state in which the vehicle described in the certificate is registered, or if the nonresident does not own a vehicle, then in the state in which the nonresident resides, if the certificate otherwise conforms with this chapter; the department shall accept it upon condition that the insurance carrier complies with (b) and (c) of this section.

The insurance carrier shall execute a power of attorney authorizing the department to accept service on its behalf of notice or process in an action arising out of a motor vehicle accident in this state.

The insurance carrier shall agree in writing that the policy shall conform with the laws of this state relating to the terms of motor vehicle liability policies issued in this state.

History.

(§ 44 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 44 ch 32 SLA 1971)

Sec. 28.20.430.
Default by nonresident insurer.

If an insurance carrier not authorized to transact business in this state, but qualified to furnish proof of financial responsibility in this state, defaults in an undertaking or agreement, the department may not accept as proof a certificate of the carrier whether previously filed or thereafter tendered as proof, so long as the default continues.

History.

(§ 45 ch 163 SLA 1959)